Arkansas, session 2025, HB1421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-9-209 is amended to read as follows:
12-9-209. Reimbursement for training costs or expenses.
(a)(1) If a county, city, town, or state agency, or other law
enforcement agency recognized by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement
Standards and Training pays the costs or expenses for training a law
enforcement officer at a state-funded or municipally operated law enforcement
training academy and another county, city, town, or state agency, or other
law enforcement agency recognized by the commission employs that law
enforcement officer within eighteen (18) months after completion of the
training in a position requiring a certificate of training from a state-
funded or municipally operated law enforcement training academy, the county,
*CEB113*
02/05/2025 3:58:41 PM CEB113

HB1421
city, town, or state agency, or other law enforcement agency recognized by
the commission that employs the law enforcement officer, at the time of
employing the law enforcement officer, shall reimburse the county, city,
town, or state agency, or other law enforcement agency recognized by the
commission for all or a portion of the costs or expenses incurred by the
county, city, town, or state agency, or other law enforcement agency
recognized by the commission for the training of the law enforcement officer
at the state-funded or municipally operated law enforcement training academy,
unless the law enforcement officer has been terminated by the county, city,
town, or state agency, or other law enforcement agency recognized by the
commission that paid the costs or expenses of training, in which case no
reimbursement is required from the county, city, town, or state agency, or
other law enforcement agency recognized by the commission employing the law
enforcement officer.
(2) Reimbursement may be sought only from the first county,
city, town, or state agency, or other law enforcement agency recognized by
the commission that employed the law enforcement officer after the county,
city, town, or state agency, or other law enforcement agency recognized by
the commission paid the costs or expenses of training.
(3) Reimbursement shall include any salary, travel expenses,
food, lodging, or other costs required to be paid by the county, city, town,
or state agency, or other law enforcement agency recognized by the commission
as follows:
(A) If the law enforcement officer is employed within two
(2) months after completion of the training, the employing agency shall
reimburse the total of the costs or expenses of training;
(B) If the law enforcement officer is employed more than
two (2) months but not more than six (6) months after completion of the
training, the employing agency shall reimburse eighty percent (80%) of the
costs or expenses of training;
(C) If the law enforcement officer is employed more than
six (6) months but not more than ten (10) months after completion of the
training, the employing agency shall reimburse sixty percent (60%) of the
costs or expenses of training;
(D) If the law enforcement officer is employed more than
ten (10) months but not more than fourteen (14) months after completion of
02/05/2025 3:58:41 PM CEB113

HB1421
the training, the employing agency shall reimburse forty percent (40%) of the
costs or expenses of training; or
(E) If the law enforcement officer is employed more than
fourteen (14) months but not more than eighteen (18) months after completion
of the training, the employing agency shall reimburse twenty percent (20%) of
the costs or expenses of training.
(b)(1) If any county, city, town, or state agency, or other law
enforcement agency recognized by the commission that employs a law
enforcement officer whose costs or expenses of training were paid by another
county, city, town, or state agency, or other law enforcement agency
recognized by the commission fails to make reimbursement for the costs or
expenses of training as required in subsection (a) of this section, the
county, city, town, or state agency, or other law enforcement agency
recognized by the commission entitled to reimbursement shall notify the
Treasurer of State.
(2) The Treasurer of State shall then withhold the amount of the
reimbursement due for training the law enforcement officer from the county or
municipal aid of the employing county, city, town, or state agency, or other
law enforcement agency recognized by the commission or from funds
appropriated to the employing state agency and shall remit the amount to the
county, city, town, or state agency, or other law enforcement agency
recognized by the commission that is entitled to the reimbursement under the
provisions of this section.
(c)(1) A private community with a population of more than five
thousand (5,000) persons that employs certified law enforcement officers is
entitled to reimbursement under this section and may remit the reimbursed
costs or expenses under subsection (a) of this section to an entity
contracting with the private community that paid the training costs or
expenses of the certified law enforcement officers.
(2) As used in this subsection, “private community” means the
same as defined in § 14-14-814.





02/05/2025 3:58:41 PM CEB113